Utah statutes.
54-4a-3.   Budget of division -- Employment of personnel.

(1)  The annual budget of the Division of Public Utilities shall provide sufficient funds for the division to hire, develop, and organize a technical and professional staff to perform the duties, powers, and responsibilities committed to it by statute.

(2)  The division director may:

(a)  hire economists, accountants, engineers, inspectors, statisticians, lawyers, law clerks, and other technical and professional experts as may be required;

(b)  retain additional experts as required for a particular matter, but only to the extent that it is necessary to supplement division staff in order to fulfill its duties; and

(c)  employ necessary administrative and support staff.

(3) (a)  The Department of Human Resource Management shall determine pay schedules using standard techniques for determining compensation.

(b)  The Department of Human Resource Management may make its compensation determinations based upon compensation common to utility companies throughout the United States.



Amended by Chapter 139, 2006 General Session

